Utah statutes.
54-7-28.   Violations by individuals -- Penalty.
Every person who, either individually, or acting as an officer, agent, or
employee of a corporation other than a public utility, violates any provision
of this title or fails to observe, obey, or comply with any order, decision,
direction, demand, or requirement, or any part or provision thereof, of the
commission, or who procures, aids, or abets any public utility in its
violation of this title or in its failure to obey, observe, or comply with any
order, decision, direction, demand, or requirement, or any part or portion
thereof, in a case in which a penalty has not been provided for the person, is
guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
